Alabama, session 2026rs, HB180.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Commencing after the expiration of the term
of office of the Conecuh County Superintendent of Education
holding office on June 1, 2026, the Conecuh County Board of
Education shall appoint the Superintendent of Education of
Conecuh County pursuant to the general law of the state. The
county superintendent of education shall possess all the
qualifications prescribed for a county superintendent of
education by the general law, shall possess all the powers
granted by the general law, and shall perform and discharge
all the duties of a county superintendent of education
prescribed by the general law. The Conecuh County
Superintendent of Education shall devote his or her entire
time to the public school business of the county and shall
receive as compensation an annual salary in an amount set by
Page 1

receive as compensation an annual salary in an amount set by
HB180 INTRODUCED
the county board of education. The board shall have discretion
to grant expenses from time to time during the term of the
superintendent. The compensation shall be payable from the
public school funds of the county and shall be the total
compensation.
Section 2. Acts 1923, No. 163 (Local Acts 1923, p. 79)
and Acts 1959, No. 524 (Acts 1959, p. 1300), relating to the
election, qualifications, powers, and duties of the Conecuh
County Superintendent of Education, are repealed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 2